Hawaii statutes.
§667-10
Power unaffected by transfer; surplus after sale.
No sale or transfer by the mortgagor shall impair or annul any right or power
of attorney given in the mortgage to the mortgagee to sell or transfer the
mortgaged property, as attorney or agent of the mortgagor, except as otherwise
provided by chapters 501 and 502. When public sale is made of the mortgaged
property under this part, distribution of the proceeds of the sale shall
be as specified in section 667-3, and the remainder of the
proceeds, if any, shall be paid over to the owner of the mortgaged property,
after deducting the amount of all claims and all
expenses attending the same. [L 1874, c 33, §4; RL 1925, §2883; RL 1935, §4728;
RL 1945, §12428; RL 1955, §336-9; HRS §667-10; am L 1972, c 90, §9(i), (j); am
L 2011, c 48, §19; am L 2012,
c 182, §14]

Case Notes

Upon foreclosure sale after death of mortgagor surplus goes
to administrator if required to pay debts. 17 H. 453 (1906) (prior to
enactment of §531-14).

Mortgagor can recover surplus from first mortgagee when
second mortgagee not a party to the action. 18 H. 352 (1907).

Owner of mortgaged property had right to surplus proceeds.
71 H. 204, 787 P.2d 674 (1990).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next